Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1803
Unlawful advertising; director; notice to insurer.

No unauthorized foreign or alien insurer of the kind described in section 44-1801 shall make, issue, circulate, or cause to be made, issued, or circulated to residents of this state any estimate, illustration, circular, pamphlet, or letter or cause to be made in any newspaper, magazine, or other publication or over any radio or television station any announcement or statement to such residents misrepresenting its financial condition or the terms of any contracts issued or to be issued or the benefits or advantages promised thereby or the dividends or share of the surplus to be received thereon in violation of the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act. Whenever the director has reason to believe that any such insurer is engaging in such unlawful advertising, it shall be his or her duty to give notice of such fact by either registered or certified mail to such insurer and to the insurance supervisory official of the domiciliary state of such insurer. For the purpose of this section, the domiciliary state of an alien insurer shall be deemed to be the state of entry or the state of the principal office in the United States.

Laws 1965, c. 247, § 3, p. 699;

Laws 1989, LB 6, § 10;

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 27.

Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, see section 44-1521.